Utah statutes.
57-26-104.   Security instrument creates assignment of rents -- Assignment
of rents creates security interest.
(1)  An enforceable security instrument creates an assignment of rents arising
from the real property described in the security instrument, unless the
security instrument provides otherwise.
(2)  An assignment of rents creates a presently effective security interest in
all accrued and unaccrued rents arising from the real property described in
the document creating the assignment, regardless of whether the document is in
the form of an absolute assignment, an absolute assignment conditioned upon
default, an assignment as additional security, or any other form.  The
security interest in rents is separate and distinct from any security interest
held by the assignee in the real property.
